Utah statutes.
34-19-12.   Deputizing of employees prohibited.
No employee of any employer whose employees are on strike or lockout for any
reason shall be deputized for any purpose arising from or in connection with
such strike by any sheriff, chief of police, town marshal, officer of the
highway patrol, or any other peace officer during the time such strike or
lockout exists.
Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
